Hawaii statutes.
§431:10D-110 Incontestability after
reinstatement. The reinstatement of any policy of life insurance or
contract of annuity delivered or issued for delivery in this State may be
contestable on account of fraud or misrepresentation of facts material to the
reinstatement only for the same period following reinstatement as the policy
provides with respect to contestability after original issuance. [L 1987, c
347, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next